Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,134
Nail technology temporary practitioner; licensure required.

Licensure shall be required before any person may act as a nail technology temporary practitioner, and no person shall assume such title without first being licensed by the department under section 38-10,135.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 41;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,193;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 396.